Utah statutes.
32B-5-306.   Purchasing or selling alcoholic product.

(1)  A retail licensee may not sell, offer for sale, or furnish an alcoholic product to:

(a)  a minor;

(b)  a person actually, apparently, or obviously intoxicated;

(c)  a known interdicted person; or

(d)  a known habitual drunkard.

(2) (a)  A patron may only purchase an alcoholic product in the licensed premises of a retail licensee from and be served by an individual who is:

(i)  staff of the retail licensee; and

(ii)  designated and trained by the retail licensee to sell and serve an alcoholic product.

(b)  An individual may sell, offer for sale, or furnish an alcoholic product to a patron only if the individual is:

(i)  staff of the retail licensee; and

(ii)  designated and trained by the retail licensee to sell and serve an alcoholic product.

(c)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a) or (b), a patron who purchases bottled wine from staff of the retail licensee or carries bottled wine onto the retail licensee's premises pursuant to Section 32B-5-307 may thereafter serve wine from the bottle to the patron or others at the patron's table.

(3)  The following may not purchase an alcoholic product for a patron:

(a)  a retail licensee; or

(b)  staff of a retail licensee.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

